Endings.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +Sing +Dual +Plur +Nom +Acc +Ins +Dat +Abl +Gen +Loc bh

LEXICON Root
+Sing+Nom:0     #;
+Sing+Acc:-am   #;
+Sing+Ins:-ā    #;
+Sing+Dat:-e    #;
+Sing:-aḥ       AblGen;
+Sing+Loc:-i    #;
+Dual:-au       NomAcc;
+Dual:-bhyām    InsDatAbl;
+Dual:-oḥ       GenLoc;
+Plur:-aḥ       NomAcc;
+Plur+Ins:-bhiḥ #;
+Plur:-bhyaḥ    DatAbl;
+Plur+Gen:-ām   #;
+Plur+Loc:-su   #;  

LEXICON AblGen
+Abl:0  #;
+Gen:0  #;

LEXICON NomAcc
+Nom:0  #;
+Acc:0  #;

LEXICON InsDatAbl
+Ins:0  #;
DatAbl;

LEXICON GenLoc
+Gen:0  #;
+Loc:0  #;

LEXICON DatAbl
+Dat:0  #;
+Abl:0  #;
